Hawaii statutes.
[§262-4.5] Outdoor lighting.
To the extent that it is practical and not in conflict with any safety
regulation or federal law, regulation, or mandate, if any airport rule or
standard relating to outdoor lighting on any ramp or apron area, roadway, or parking
lot conflicts with any county ordinance or other rule regarding outdoor
lighting, the more stringent requirement or standard shall govern all new installations
of outdoor lighting. [L 2007, c 121, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next